North Carolina, session 2025, HB1109.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The North Carolina Department of Transportation shall study project
delivery performance of projects prioritized utilizing the Strategic Prioritization Funding Plan
for Transportation Investments (STI) laws, Article 14B of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes;
study factors negatively affecting project delivery of projects prioritized utilizing the STI laws;
study related alternative funding scenarios; recommend legislative changes to STI laws, or other
changes, that will improve the delivery of projects prioritized utilizing the STI laws; and provide
any information or data on any other subject or topic which the Department deems relevant to
this study. The Department may consult with planning organizations, the construction industry,
and other relevant partners in conducting the study.
SECTION 2. No later than November 1, 2026, the North Carolina Department of
Transportation shall submit a report on the study required by this act to the chairs of the House
Select Committee on North Carolina's Transportation Future, the chairs of the Joint Legislative
Transportation Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1109-v-2*